New York, session 2025-2026, A11347.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13-0340-e of the environmental conservation law, as 2 amended by chapter 317 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 13-0340-e. Scup (Stenotomus chrysops). 5 The department may, until December thirty-first, two thousand [twen- 6 ty-six] twenty-nine, fix by regulation measures for the management of 7 scup (Stenotomus chrysops), including size limits, catch and possession 8 limits, open and closed seasons, closed areas, restrictions on the 9 manner of taking and landing, requirements for permits and eligibility 10 therefor, recordkeeping requirements, requirements on the amount and 11 type of fishing effort and gear, and requirements relating to transpor- 12 tation, possession and sale, provided that such regulations are no less 13 restrictive than requirements set forth in this chapter and provided 14 further that such regulations are consistent with the compliance 15 requirements of applicable fishery management plans adopted by the 16 Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission and with applicable 17 provisions of fishery management plans adopted pursuant to the Federal 18 Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. § 1800 et seq.). 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15011-01-6